Utah statutes.
31A-17-102.   Standards for accounting rules.

When adopting accounting rules, the commissioner shall consider recommendations made by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners. Accounting rules shall follow generally accepted accounting principles, except as modified by statutory insurance accounting principles.

